Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska19-4017.01
Terms, defined.

As used in sections 19-4015 to 19-4038, unless the context otherwise requires:

(1) Record owner shall mean the fee owner of real property as shown in the records of the register of deeds office in the county in which the business area is located. A contract purchaser of real property shall be considered the record owner for purposes of sections 19-4015 to 19-4038 and the only person entitled to petition pursuant to section 19-4028 or protest pursuant to section 19-4027, if the contract is recorded in the register of deeds office in the county in which the business area is located;

(2) Assessable unit shall mean front foot, square foot, equivalent front foot, or other unit of assessment established under the proposed method of assessment set forth in the resolution of intention to create a business improvement district; and

(3) Space shall mean the square foot space wherein customers, patients, clients, or other invitees are received and space from time to time used or available for use in connection with a business or profession of a user, excepting all space owned or used by political subdivisions.

Laws 1983, LB 22, § 1.